Wisconsin, session 2025, SB545.
do enact as follows:SB545,11Section 1. 101.91 (1j) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,2,32101.91 (1j) “Installer” means a person who is in the business of installing new 3manufactured homes.SB545,24Section 2. 101.91 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,2,115101.91 (3) (intro.) “Manufactured home dealer” means a person who, for a 6commission or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, buys or, rents, markets for sale 7or exchange, lists for sale or exchange, or offers or attempts to negotiate a sale or 8exchange of an interest in, a manufactured homes home or who is engaged wholly or 9partially in the business of selling manufactured homes, whether or not the 10manufactured homes are owned by the person, but does not include any of the 11following:SB545,312Section 3. 101.91 (4) of the statutes is repealed.SB545,413Section 4. 101.91 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,2,1614101.91 (9) “Manufactured home salesperson” means any person who is 15employed by a manufactured home manufacturer or manufactured home dealer to 16sell, market for sale, list for sale, or lease manufactured homes.SB545,517Section 5. 101.9203 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,2,2118101.9203 (1) Except as provided in subs. (3) and sub. (4), the owner of a 19manufactured home situated in this state or intended to be situated in this state 20shall make application for a certificate of title under s. 101.9209 for the 21manufactured home if the owner has newly acquired the manufactured home.SB545,622Section 6. 101.9203 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,3,81101.9203 (2) Any owner who situates in this state a manufactured home for 2which a certificate of title is required without the certificate of title having been 3issued or applied for, knowing that the certificate of title has not been issued or 4applied for, may be required to forfeit not more than $200. A certificate of title is 5considered to have been applied for when the application accompanied by the 6required fee has been delivered to the department or, deposited in the mail properly 7addressed and with postage prepaid, or submitted to the department in an 8automated format prescribed by the department.SB545,79Section 7. 101.9203 (3) of the statutes is repealed.SB545,810Section 8. 101.9204 (1) (h) of the statutes is created to read:SB545,3,1211101.9204 (1) (h) The county in which the manufactured home is situated or 12intended to be situated.SB545,913Section 9. 101.9205 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,3,1614101.9205 (2) (intro.) The department shall maintain and make available to 15the public a record of all applications, and all certificates of title issued by the 16department, indexed in the following manners:SB545,1017Section 10. 101.9205 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB545,3,1918101.9205 (2) (bm) By county in which the manufactured home is situated or 19intended to be situated.SB545,1120Section 11. 101.9206 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,3,2221101.9206 (1) (d) A description of the manufactured home, including make, 22model and, identification number, and year of manufacture.SB545,1223Section 12. 101.9206 (1) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB545,4,21101.9206 (1) (f) The address where the manufactured home is situated or 2intended to be situated.SB545,133Section 13. 101.9209 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,4,94101.9209 (3) A transfer by an owner is not effective until the applicable 5provisions of this section have been complied with. An owner who has delivered 6possession of the manufactured home to the transferee and has complied with the 7provisions of this section requiring action by him or her the owner is not liable as 8owner for any damages thereafter resulting from use of the mobile manufactured 9home.SB545,1410Section 14. 101.9209 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,4,1511101.9209 (5) (c) A certificate is considered under this subsection to have been 12applied for when the application accompanied by the required fee has been 13delivered to the department or, deposited in the mail properly addressed with 14postage prepaid, or submitted to the department in an automated format 15prescribed by the department.SB545,1516Section 15. 101.921 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,4,2117101.921 (1) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), if a A manufactured home 18dealer who acquires a manufactured home and holds it for resale or accepts a 19manufactured home for sale on consignment, the manufactured home dealer may 20not submit to the department the certificate of title or application for certificate of 21title naming the manufactured home dealer as owner of the manufactured home.SB545,5,2122(d) Upon transferring the a manufactured home to another person, the 23manufactured home dealer shall immediately give the transferee, on a form 24prescribed by the department, a receipt for all title, security interest, and sales tax 1moneys paid to the manufactured home dealer for transmittal to the department 2when required. Unless the manufactured home has no certificate of title as a result 3of the exemption under s. 101.9203 (4), the manufactured home dealer shall 4promptly execute the assignment and warranty of title, showing the name and 5address of the transferee and of any secured party holding a security interest 6created or reserved at the time of the resale or sale on consignment, in the spaces 7provided therefor on the certificate or as the department prescribes. Within 7 8business days following the sale or transfer, the manufactured home dealer shall 9mail or deliver the certificate or application for certificate to the department with 10the transferee’s application for a new certificate, unless the transferee is exempt 11from making application for a certificate of title under s. 101.9203 (4). A 12nonresident who purchases a manufactured home from a manufactured home 13dealer in this state may not, unless otherwise authorized by rule of the department, 14apply for a certificate of title issued for the manufactured home in this state unless 15the manufactured home dealer determines that a certificate of title is necessary to 16protect the interests of a secured party. The manufactured home dealer is 17responsible for determining whether a certificate of title and perfection of security 18interest is required. The manufactured home dealer is liable for any damages 19incurred by the department or any secured party for the manufactured home 20dealer’s failure to perfect a security interest that the manufactured home dealer 21had knowledge of at the time of sale.SB545,1622Section 16. 101.921 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,6,423101.921 (1) (b) Except when all available spaces for a manufactured home 24dealer’s reassignment on a certificate of title have been completed or as otherwise 1authorized by rules of the department, a A manufactured home dealer who 2acquires a manufactured home and holds it for resale or accepts a manufactured 3home for sale on consignment may not apply for a certificate of title naming the 4manufactured home dealer as owner of the manufactured home.SB545,175Section 17. 101.921 (1) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB545,186Section 18. 101.9211 (4) (b) 3. and 4. of the statutes are repealed.SB545,197Section 19. 101.9212 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,6,98101.9212 (title) When department to issue a new certificate; records 9of inactive certificates.SB545,2010Section 20. 101.9212 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB545,6,1411101.9212 (4) When the department issues a new certificate of title for a 12manufactured home, the department shall update the records maintained under s. 13101.9205 to indicate that any previous certificates of title the department issued for 14the manufactured home are inactive.SB545,2115Section 21. 101.9216 (3) and (4) of the statutes are repealed.SB545,2216Section 22. 101.9217 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB545,6,2417101.9217 (2) (a) An owner shall promptly deliver the owner’s certificate of title 18to any secured party who is named on it or who has a security interest in the 19manufactured home described in it under any other applicable prior law of this 20state, upon receipt of a notice from such the secured party that the security interest 21is to be assigned, extended or perfected. Any owner who fails to deliver the 22certificate of title to a secured party requesting it under this paragraph shall be 23liable to such secured party for any loss caused to the secured party thereby and 24may be required to forfeit not more than $200.SB545,231Section 23. 101.9221 (3) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb545 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb545 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB545 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB545 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB545: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting